Wisconsin, session 2025, SB994.
do enact as follows:SB994,11Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.SB994,2,22(1) Public affairs network; request for proposals.SB994,2,83(a) In this subsection, “state government proceedings” includes floor sessions 4of the senate and assembly, meetings of legislative committees, meetings of 5executive branch agencies, supreme court and other judicial proceedings, news 6conferences by legislators or other government officials relating to legislative, 7judicial, or executive branch official business, and civic events directly related to 8legislative, judicial, or executive branch official business.SB994,2,139(b) No later than 30 days after the effective date of this paragraph, the 10department of administration shall issue a request for proposals or other 11procurement document to solicit bids on a contract for the operation of a public 12affairs network in this state. The contract shall include all of the following 13requirements and prohibitions:SB994,3,2141. The public affairs network shall provide unedited live video and audio 15coverage, including online, of state government proceedings. In making coverage 16decisions under this subdivision, the public affairs network shall prioritize floor 17sessions of the senate and assembly, meetings of legislative committees, meetings of 18executive branch agencies, and supreme court and other judicial proceedings and 19may, to the extent practicable, provide coverage of news conferences by legislators 20or other government officials relating to legislative, judicial, or executive branch 1official business and civic events directly related to legislative, judicial, or executive 2branch official business.SB994,3,432. The public affairs network shall provide coverage by live stream online of 4all legislative proceedings that are open to the public.SB994,3,753. The public affairs network shall permanently maintain and provide online 6public access to unedited digital archives of all of its coverage specified in subds. 1. 7and 2.SB994,3,1084. The public affairs network may not charge any fee to access live or archived 9coverage of floor sessions of the senate and assembly or meetings of the joint 10committee on finance.SB994,3,11115. The public affairs network shall be strictly nonpartisan.SB994,3,13126. The public affairs network shall provide that its coverage may not be used 13for campaign purposes.SB994,3,1414